Indiana, session 2026, SB62.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 31-30-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.218-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The juvenile court does not have jurisdiction
over an individual for an alleged violation of:
(1) IC 35-41-5-1(a) (attempted murder);
(2) IC 35-42-1-1 (murder);
(3) IC 35-42-3-2 (kidnapping);
(4) IC 35-42-4-1 (rape);
(5) IC 35-42-4-2 (criminal deviate conduct) (before its repeal);
(6) (5) IC 35-42-5-1 (robbery) if:
(A) the robbery was committed while armed with a deadly
weapon; or
(B) the robbery results in bodily injury or serious bodily
injury; or
(7) IC 35-42-5-2 (carjacking) (before its repeal);
(8) IC 35-47-10 (children and firearms), if charged as a felony; or
(9) (6) any offense that may be joined under IC 35-34-1-9(a)(2)
2026 IN 62—LS 6290/DI 106


with any crime listed in this subsection;
if the individual was at least sixteen (16) years of age but less than
eighteen (18) years of age at the time of the alleged violation.
(b) Once an individual described in subsection (a) has been charged
with any offense listed in subsection (a), the court having adult
criminal jurisdiction shall retain jurisdiction over the case if the
individual pleads guilty to or is convicted of any offense listed in
subsection (a)(1) through (a)(8). (a)(5).
(c) If:
(1) an individual described in subsection (a) is charged with one
(1) or more offenses listed in subsection (a);
(2) all the charges under subsection (a)(1) through (a)(8) (a)(5)
resulted in an acquittal or were dismissed; and
(3) the individual pleads guilty to or is convicted of any offense
other than an offense listed in subsection (a)(1) through (a)(8);
(a)(5);
the court having adult criminal jurisdiction may withhold judgment and
transfer jurisdiction to the juvenile court for adjudication and
disposition. In determining whether to transfer jurisdiction to the
juvenile court for adjudication and disposition, the court having adult
criminal jurisdiction shall consider whether there are appropriate
services available in the juvenile justice system, whether the child is
amenable to rehabilitation under the juvenile justice system, and
whether it is in the best interests of the safety and welfare of the
community that the child be transferred to juvenile court. All orders
concerning release conditions remain in effect until a juvenile court
detention hearing, which must be held not later than forty-eight (48)
hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays, after the order
of transfer of jurisdiction.
(d) A court having adult criminal jurisdiction, and not a juvenile
court, has jurisdiction over a person who is at least twenty-one (21)
years of age for an alleged offense:
(1) committed while the person was a child; and
(2) that could have been waived under IC 31-30-3.
This subsection applies to a criminal proceeding for an alleged offense
regardless of whether the offense was committed before, on, or after
July 1, 2023, or the juvenile becomes twenty-one (21) years of age
before, on, or after July 1, 2023.
SECTION 2. IC 31-30-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.148-2024,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. Except for those cases in which the juvenile
court has no jurisdiction in accordance with IC 31-30-1-4, the court
2026 IN 62—LS 6290/DI 106


shall, upon motion of the prosecuting attorney and after full
investigation and hearing, waive jurisdiction if it finds that:
(1) the child is charged with:
(A) an act that, if committed by an adult, would be:
(A) (i) a Level 1 felony, Level 2 felony, Level 3 felony, or
Level 4 felony, except a felony defined by IC 35-48-4;
(B) (ii) involuntary manslaughter as a Level 5 felony under
IC 35-42-1-4;
(C) (iii) reckless homicide as a Level 5 felony under
IC 35-42-1-5; or
(D) (iv) unlawful carrying of a handgun as a felony under
IC 35-47-2-1.5; or
(B) unlawful possession of a firearm by a child, if charged
as a felony under IC 35-47-10-5;
(2) there is probable cause to believe that the child has committed
the act; and
(3) the child was at least sixteen (16) years of age when the act
charged was allegedly committed;
unless it would be in the best interests of the child and of the safety and
welfare of the community for the child to remain within the juvenile
justice system.
SECTION 3. IC 35-47-2-1.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.175-2022,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) The following terms are defined for this
section:
(1) "Adjudicated a mental defective" means a determination by a
court that a person:
(A) presents a danger to the person or to others; or
(B) lacks the mental capacity necessary to contract or manage
the person's affairs.
The term includes a finding of insanity by a court in a criminal
proceeding.
(2) "Alien" means any person who is not lawfully in the United
States. The term includes:
(A) any person who has:
(i) entered the United States without inspection and
authorization by an immigration officer; and
(ii) not been paroled into the United States under the federal
Immigration and Nationality Act;
(B) a nonimmigrant:
(i) whose authorized period of stay has expired; or
(ii) who has violated the terms of the nonimmigrant category
2026 IN 62—LS 6290/DI 106


under which the person was admitted;
(C) a person paroled under the federal Immigration and
Nationality Act whose period of parole has:
(i) expired; or
(ii) been terminated; and
(D) a person subject to an order:
(i) of deportation, exclusion, or removal; or
(ii) to depart the United States voluntarily;
regardless of whether or not the person has left the United
States.
(3) "Committed to a mental institution" means the formal
commitment of a person to a mental institution by a court. The
term includes:
(A) a commitment for:
(i) a cognitive or mental defect; or
(ii) a mental illness; and
(B) involuntary commitments.
The term does not include voluntary commitments or a
commitment made for observational purposes.
(4) "Crime of domestic violence" has the meaning set forth in
IC 35-31.5-2-78.
(5) "Dangerous" has the meaning set forth in IC 35-47-14-1.
(6) "Fugitive from justice" means any person who:
(A) flees or leaves from any state to avoid prosecution for a
felony or misdemeanor offense; or
(B) flees or leaves any state to avoid testifying in a criminal
proceeding.
(7) "Indictment" means any formal accusation of a crime made by
a prosecuting attorney in any court for a crime punishable by a
term of imprisonment exceeding one (1) year.
(8) A crime or offense "punishable by a term of imprisonment
exceeding one (1) year" does not include a federal or state crime
or offense pertaining to antitrust violations, unfair trade practices,
restraints of trade, or other similar offenses relating to the
regulation of business practices.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the following
persons may not knowingly or intentionally carry a handgun:
(1) A person convicted of a federal or state offense punishable by
a term of imprisonment exceeding one (1) year.
(2) A fugitive from justice.
(3) An alien.
(4) A person convicted of:
2026 IN 62—LS 6290/DI 106


(A) a crime of domestic violence (IC 35-31.5-2-78);
(B) domestic battery (IC 35-42-2-1.3); or
(C) criminal stalking (IC 35-45-10-5).
(5) A person restrained by an order of protection issued under
IC 34-26-5.
(6) A person under indictment.
(7) A person who has been:
(A) adjudicated dangerous under IC 35-47-14-6;
(B) adjudicated a mental defective; or
(C) committed to a mental institution.
(8) A person dishonorably discharged from:
(A) military service; or
(B) the National Guard.
(9) A person who renounces the person's United States citizenship
in the manner described in 8 U.S.C. 1481.
(10) A person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but is
less than
(A) eighteen (18) years of age; or
(B) twenty-three (23) years of age and has an adjudication as
a delinquent child for an act described by IC 35-47-4-5
unless authorized under IC 35-47-10.
(c) Subsection (b)(4)(A) and (b)(4)(B) does not apply to a person if
a court has restored the person's right to possess a firearm under
IC 35-47-4-7.
(d) A person who has:
(1) been adjudicated dangerous under IC 35-47-14-6; and
(2) successfully petitioned for the return of a firearm under
IC 35-47-14-8 with respect to the adjudication under subdivision
(1);
is not prohibited from carrying a handgun under subsection (b) on the
basis that the person was adjudicated dangerous under subdivision (1).
However, the person may still be prohibited from carrying a handgun
on one (1) or more of the other grounds listed in subsection (b).
(e) A person who violates this section commits unlawful carrying of
a handgun, a Class A misdemeanor. However, the offense is a Level 5
felony if:
(1) the offense is committed:
(A) on or in school property;
(B) within five hundred (500) feet of school property; or
(C) on a school bus; or
(2) the person:
(A) has a prior conviction of any offense under:
2026 IN 62—LS 6290/DI 106


(i) this section;
(ii) section 1 of this chapter (carrying a handgun without a
license) (before its repeal); or
(iii) section 22 of this chapter; or
(B) has been convicted of a felony within fifteen (15) years
before the date of the offense.
SECTION 4. IC 35-47-10-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.148-2024,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A child who knowingly or intentionally or
recklessly possesses a firearm for any purpose other than a purpose
described in section 1 of this chapter commits dangerous unlawful
possession of a firearm by a child, a Class A misdemeanor. However,
the offense is a Level 5 felony if: the child has a prior conviction under
this section or has been adjudicated a delinquent for an act that would
be an offense under this section.
(1) the child has a prior conviction under this section;
(2) the child has been adjudicated a delinquent for an act that
would be an offense under this section; or
(3) the child committed the offense:
(A) on or in school property;
(B) within five hundred (500) feet of school property; or
(C) on a school bus.
(b) A child who knowingly or intentionally provides a firearm to
another child whom the child knows:
(1) is ineligible for any reason to purchase or otherwise receive
from a dealer a firearm; or
(2) intends to use the firearm to commit a crime;
commits a Level 5 felony. However, the offense is a Level 3 felony if
the other child uses the firearm to commit murder (IC 35-42-1-1).
2026 IN 62—LS 6290/DI 106